Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1947.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 1308.3, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 21, O.S.L. 2025 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1308.3), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1308.3. A. As used in this section:


1. “Health care sharing ministry” (HCSM) means a not-for-profit


organization that is tax-exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and:


a. limits its members to those who share a common


set of ethical or religious beliefs,

Req. No. 2345 Page 1


b. facilitates sharing of medical expenses between


members in accordance with its ethical or


religious beliefs,


c. requires regular contributions from members with


no assumptions of risk or promise to pay for


medical expenses,


d. provides an electronic report at least quarterly


to members detailing the amount of needs shared


and contributions received,


e. conducts an annual audit which shall be performed


by an independent certified public accounting


firm in accordance with generally accepted


accounting principles and shall be made available


to the public upon request, and


f. provides a disclaimer stating that it is not an


insurance company and participation is voluntary;


and


2. “Qualified HCSM member” means any resident of this state who


has been an active member of an HCSM for at least one (1) month


during the applicable tax year.


B. Any active employee eligible to participate or who is a


participant may opt out of the state’s basic plan as outlined in


Sections 1370 and 1371 of this title, or may opt out of the health


and dental basic plan options only and retain the life and

Req. No. 2345 Page 2


disability plan benefits, provided that the participant is currently


covered by a separate health insurance plan or will be covered by a


separate health insurance plan at or before the beginning of the


next plan year or is a qualified HCSM member or will be at or before


the beginning of the next plan year. Any active employee eligible


to participate or who is a participant opting out of coverage


pursuant to this section shall provide proof of the separate health


insurance plan or health care sharing ministry participation and


sign an affidavit attesting that the participant is currently


covered and does not require state-provided health insurance each


plan year. Any active employee opting out of the state’s basic plan


or the health and dental basic plan options pursuant to this section


due to coverage by a separate health insurance plan shall receive


One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) in lieu of the flexible benefit


amount the employee would be otherwise eligible to receive. Any


active employee who is a qualified HCSM member opting out of the


state’s basic plan or the health and dental basic plan options shall


receive the full flexible benefit amount the employee would be


otherwise eligible to receive. Any savings realized by the state as


a result of a participant opting out of health insurance plan


coverage shall be retained by the state.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 1370, as


amended by Section 10, Chapter 245, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1370), is amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 2345 Page 3


Section 1370. A. Subject to the requirement that a participant


must elect the default benefits, or the basic plan, or is a person


who has retired from a branch of the United States military and has


been provided with health care through a federal plan, to the extent


that it is consistent with federal law, or is an active employee who


is eligible to participate and who is a participant who has opted


out of the state’s basic plan according to the provisions of Section


1308.3 of this title, and provides proof of this coverage, flexible


benefit dollars may be used to purchase any of the benefits offered


by the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Board under the


flexible benefits plan. A participant who has opted out of the


state’s basic plan and provided proof of other coverage as described


in this subsection shall receive One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00)


an amount pursuant to Section 1308.3 of this title in lieu of the


flexible benefit monthly. A participant’s flexible benefit dollars


for a plan year shall consist of the sum of (1) flexible benefit


allowance credited to a participant by the participating employer,


and (2) pay conversion dollars elected by a participant.


B. Each participant shall be credited annually with a specified


amount as a flexible benefit allowance which shall be available for


the purchase of benefits. For participants on a biweekly payroll


system the disbursement of the flexible benefit allowance shall be


credited over twenty-four pay periods resulting in two pay periods


that do not reflect a credit. The amount of the flexible benefit

Req. No. 2345 Page 4


allowance credited to each participant shall be communicated to him


or her prior to the enrollment period for each plan year.


C. Except as provided in subsection D of this section, for the


plan year beginning January 1, 2013, the benefit allowance shall not


be less than the Plan Year plan year 2012 benefit allowance amounts,


and each plan year thereafter, the amount of a participant’s benefit


allowance, which shall be the total amount the employer contributes


for the payment of insurance premiums or other benefits, shall be:


1. The greater of the amount of benefit which the participant


would have qualified for as of plan year 2021, or an amount equal to


the monthly premium of the HealthChoice High Option plan, the


average monthly premiums of the dental plans, the monthly premium of


the disability plan, and the monthly premium of the basic life


insurance plan offered to state employees or the amount determined


by the Council Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Board based


on a formula for determining a participant’s benefit credits


consistent with the requirements of 26 U.S.C., Section 125(g)(2) and


regulations thereunder;


2. The greater of the amount of benefit which the participant


would have qualified for as of plan year 2021 or an amount equal to


the monthly premium of the HealthChoice High Option plan, the


average monthly premiums of the dental plans, the monthly premium of


the disability plan, and the monthly premium of the basic life


insurance plan offered to state employees plus one of the additional

Req. No. 2345 Page 5


amounts as follows for participants who elect to include one or more


dependents:


a. for a spouse, seventy-five percent (75%) of the


HealthChoice High Option plan, available for coverage


of a spouse,


b. for one child, seventy-five percent (75%) of the


HealthChoice High Option plan, for coverage of one


child,


c. for two or more children, seventy-five percent (75%)


of the HealthChoice High Option plan, for coverage of


two or more children,


d. for a spouse and one child, seventy-five percent (75%)


of the HealthChoice High Option plan, for coverage of


a spouse and one child, or


e. for a spouse and two or more children, seventy-five


percent (75%) of the HealthChoice High Option plan,


for coverage of a spouse and two or more children;


3. For the plan year beginning January 1, 2022, the amount of a


participant’s benefit allowance shall be increased by two percent


(2%) from the amount provided in the previous year;


4. For the plan year beginning January 1, 2023, the amount of a


participant’s benefit allowance shall be increased by two percent


(2%) from the amount provided in the previous year; or



Req. No. 2345 Page 6


5. The greater of the amount of benefit which the participant


would have qualified for as of plan year 2023, or an amount equal to


the monthly premium of the HealthChoice High Option plan, the


average monthly premiums of the dental plans, the monthly premium of


the disability plan, and the monthly premium of the basic life


insurance plan offered to state employees plus one of the additional


amounts as follows for participants who elect to include one or more


dependents:


a. for a spouse, seventy-five percent (75%) of the


HealthChoice High Option plan, available for coverage


of a spouse,


b. for one child, seventy-five percent (75%) of the


HealthChoice High Option plan, for coverage of one


child,


c. for two or more children, seventy-five percent (75%)


of the HealthChoice High Option plan, for coverage of


two or more children,


d. for a spouse and one child, seventy-five percent (75%)


of the HealthChoice High Option plan, for coverage of


a spouse and one child, or


e. for a spouse and two or more children, seventy-five


percent (75%) of the HealthChoice High Option plan,


for coverage of a spouse and two or more children.



Req. No. 2345 Page 7


D. To the extent that it is consistent with federal laws and


regulations, and in particular the regulations set forth by the


United States Secretary of Defense in 32 C.F.R., Section


199.8(d)(6), a benefit may be provided to an employee who is an


eligible TRICARE beneficiary whereby he or she may purchase a group


TRICARE Supplemental supplemental product under a qualifying


cafeteria plan consistent with the requirements of 26 U.S.C.,


Section 125, provided that:


1. The state, as employer, may not provide any payment for nor


receive any consideration or compensation for offering the benefit;


2. The employer’s only involvement is in providing the


administrative support for the benefit under the cafeteria plan; and


3. The employee’s participation in the plan is completely


voluntary.


The benefit allowance under paragraph 2 of subsection C of this


section of an employee whose plan participation includes a group


TRICARE Supplemental supplemental benefit shall not include any


allowance or portion thereof for such TRICARE Supplemental


supplemental benefit.


E. This section shall not prohibit payments for supplemental


health insurance coverage made pursuant to Section 1314.4 of this


title or payments for the cost of providing health insurance


coverage for dependents of employees of the Grand River Dam


Authority.

Req. No. 2345 Page 8


F. If a participant desires to buy benefits whose sum total of


benefit prices is in excess of his or her flexible benefit


allowance, the participant may elect to use pay conversion dollars


to purchase such excess benefits. Pay conversion dollars may be


elected through a salary reduction agreement made pursuant to the


election procedures of Section 1371 of this title. The elected


amount shall be deducted from the participant’s compensation in


equal amounts each pay period, with the exception of participants on


a biweekly payroll system, where such deduction shall occur over


twenty-four pay periods over the plan year. On termination of


employment during a plan year, a participant shall have no


obligation to pay the participating employer any pay conversion


dollars allocated to the portion of the plan year after the


participant’s termination of employment.


G. If a participant elects benefits whose sum total of benefit


prices is less than his or her flexible benefit allowance, he or she


shall receive any excess flexible benefit allowance as taxable


compensation. Such taxable compensation will be paid in


substantially equal amounts each pay period, with the exception of


participants on a biweekly payroll system, where such deduction


shall occur over twenty-four pay periods over the plan year. On


termination during a plan year, a participant shall have no right to


receive any such taxable cash compensation allocated to the portion


of the plan year after the participant’s termination. Nothing

Req. No. 2345 Page 9


herein shall affect a participant’s obligation to elect the minimum


benefits or to accept the default benefits of the plan with


corresponding reduction in the sum of his or her flexible benefit


allowance equal to the sum total benefit price of such minimum


benefits or default benefits.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2345 CAD 1/15/2026 9:07:16 AM

































Req. No. 2345 Page 10